Maryland, session 2025, SB0330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–210.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Cohabitant” means an individual who for a period of at least 180 days
in the year before the death of a fallen law enforcement officer or rescue worker:
(i) had a relationship of mutual interdependence with the fallen law
enforcement officer or rescue worker; and
(ii) resided with the fallen law enforcement officer or rescue worker
in the dwelling.
(3) “Disabled law enforcement officer or rescue worker” means an
individual who:
(i) is a law enforcement officer or rescue worker, as those terms are
defined, by law, by the county or municipal corporation as required under subsection (c) of
this section;
(ii) has been found to be permanently and totally disabled by an
administrative body or court of competent jurisdiction authorized to make such a
determination; and
(iii) became disabled:
1. as a result of or in the course of employment as a law
enforcement officer or a correctional officer; or
2. while in the active service of a fire, rescue, or emergency
medical service, unless the disability was the result of the individual’s own willful
misconduct or abuse of alcohol or drugs.
(4) (i) “Dwelling” means real property that:

SENATE BILL 330 3
1. is the legal residence of a disabled law enforcement officer
or rescue worker, a surviving spouse, or a cohabitant; and
2. is occupied by not more than two families.
(ii) “Dwelling” includes the lot or curtilage and structures necessary
to use the real property as a residence.
(5) “Fallen law enforcement officer or rescue worker” means [an individual
who dies]:
(i) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO DIES as a result of or in the course of
employment as a law enforcement officer or a correctional officer; [or]
(ii) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO DIES while in the active service of a fire,
rescue, or emergency medical service, unless the death was the result of the individual’s
own willful misconduct or abuse of alcohol or drugs; OR
(III) A DISABLED LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER OR RESCUE
WORKER WHO DIES REGARDLESS OF THE CAUSE OF DEATH.
(6) “Surviving spouse” means a surviving spouse, who has not remarried,
of a fallen law enforcement officer or rescue worker.
(b) (1) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of
a county or municipal corporation may grant, by law, a property tax credit under this
section against the county or municipal corporation property tax imposed on a dwelling
that is owned by a disabled law enforcement officer or rescue worker, a surviving spouse of
a fallen law enforcement officer or rescue worker, or a cohabitant:
[(1)] (I) if the dwelling was owned by the disabled law enforcement officer
or rescue worker at the time the law enforcement officer or rescue worker was adjudged to
be permanently and totally disabled or by the fallen law enforcement officer or rescue
worker at the time of the fallen law enforcement officer’s or rescue worker’s death;
[(2)] (II) if the disabled law enforcement officer or rescue worker was
domiciled in the State as of, or any time within the 5 years before, the date the disabled
law enforcement officer or rescue worker was adjudged to be permanently and totally
disabled or the fallen law enforcement officer or rescue worker, the surviving spouse, or the
cohabitant was domiciled in the State as of, or any time within the 5 years before, the date
of the fallen law enforcement officer’s or rescue worker’s death and the dwelling was
acquired by the disabled law enforcement officer or rescue worker [within 10 years of the
date] AFTER the disabled law enforcement officer or rescue worker was adjudged to be
permanently and totally disabled or by the surviving spouse or cohabitant [within 10 years
of] AFTER the fallen law enforcement officer’s or rescue worker’s death; OR

SENATE BILL 330
[(3)] (III) if the dwelling was owned by the surviving spouse or cohabitant
at the time of the fallen law enforcement officer’s or rescue worker’s death[; or].
[(4)] (2) [if the] FOR A dwelling THAT was acquired after [the] A disabled
law enforcement officer or rescue worker, [the] A surviving spouse, or [the] A cohabitant
qualified for a credit for a former dwelling under [item (1), (2), or (3)] PARAGRAPH (1) of
this subsection, [to the extent of the previous credit] THE CREDIT SHALL BE GRANTED
FOR THE NEWLY ACQUIRED DWELLING IN AN AMOUNT THAT REDUCES THE
PROPERTY TAXES OWED ON THE NEWLY ACQUIRED DWELLING BY THE SAME
PROPORTION AS THE CREDIT REDUCED THE PROPERTY TAXES ON THE FORMER
DWELLING.
(3) FOR A CREDIT GRANTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1)
OR (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF THE AMOUNT OF PROPERTY TAX IMPOSED ON THE
DWELLING INCREASES DURING A TAXABLE YEAR OCCURRING AFTER THE CREDIT IS
INITIALLY GRANTED, THE CREDIT FOR THAT TAXABLE YEAR MAY BE GRANTED IN AN
AMOUNT THAT REDUCES THE PROPERTY TAXES OWED ON THE DWELLING BY THE
SAME PROPORTION AS THE INITIAL CREDIT REDUCED THE PROPERTY TAXES ON THE
DWELLING.
(c) A county or municipal corporation:
(1) shall define, by law, who is a law enforcement officer or rescue worker;
and
(2) may [provide], by law[, for]:
(i) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (A)(5)(III) OF THIS
SECTION, LIMIT ELIGIBILITY FOR THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION TO
INDIVIDUALS DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(5)(I) AND (II) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) ESTABLISH the amount and duration of a property tax credit
allowed under this section;
[(ii)] (III) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (B)(1)(II) OF THIS
SECTION, PROVIDE FOR any [additional] limitation to the number of years the dwelling
was acquired within the date of an adjudication of disability or death; and
[(iii)] (IV) PROVIDE FOR any other provision necessary to carry out
the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.